Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB201.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with whom
the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services shall provide coverage
for evaluation and management services. If the department or a managed care
organization establishes coverage limits for evaluation and management services,
coverage required under this section shall not be limited to fewer than two (2)
evaluation and management service units per Medicaid-participating provider, per
recipient, per date of service.
Section 2. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1 of this Act is
necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the
necessary federal authorization or approval to implement Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Section 1 of this Act for
which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall constitute the specific authorization
required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/9/2026 4:22 PM Jacketed